Hawaii statutes.
§431:15-407 Claims of residents against
insurers domiciled in reciprocal states. (a) In a liquidation proceeding
in a reciprocal state against an insurer domiciled in that state, claimants
against the insurer who reside within this State may file claims either with
the ancillary receiver, if any, in this State, or with the domiciliary
liquidator. Claims must be filed on or before the last date fixed for the
filing of claims in the domiciliary liquidation proceeding.

(b) Claims belonging to claimants residing in
this State may be proved either in the domiciliary state under the law of that
state, or in ancillary proceedings, if any, in this State. If a claimant
elects to prove a claim in this State, the claimant shall file a claim with the
liquidator in the manner provided in section 431:15-325 and section
431:15-326. The ancillary receiver shall make a recommendation to the court as
under section 431:15-333. The ancillary receiver shall also arrange a date for
hearing if necessary under section 431:15-329 and shall give notice to the
liquidator in the domiciliary state, either by certified mail or by personal
service at least forty days prior to the date set for hearing. If the
domiciliary liquidator, within thirty days after the giving of such notice,
gives notice in writing to the ancillary receiver and to the claimant, either
by certified mail or by personal service, of the domiciliary liquidator's
intention to contest the claim, the domiciliary liquidator shall be entitled to
appear or to be represented in any proceeding in this State involving the
adjudication of the claim.

(c) The final allowance of the claim by the
court of this State shall be accepted as conclusive as to amount and as to
priority against special deposits or other security located in this State. [L
1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next